apertium-pol.pol.dix
<pardef n="upie/c__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>c</l>         <r>c<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kę</l>        <r>c<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cze</l>       <r>c<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czyta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ką</l>        <r>c<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cz</l>        <r>c<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytaj"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>k</l>         <r>c<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytałem"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>czono</l>     <r>c<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cz</l>        <r>c<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__jedzony"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cze</l>       <r>c<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__zdanie"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kąc</l>       <r>c<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kąc</l>       <r>c<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="BASE__będący"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="pie/c__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>c</l>         <r>c<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kę</l>        <r>c<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cze</l>       <r>c<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czyta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ką</l>        <r>c<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cz</l>        <r>c<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytaj"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>k</l>         <r>c<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytałem"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>czono</l>     <r>c<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cz</l>        <r>c<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__jedzony"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cze</l>       <r>c<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__zdanie"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kąc</l>       <r>c<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kąc</l>       <r>c<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="BASE__będący"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="j/echać__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>echać</l>     <r>echać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adę</l>       <r>echać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edzie</l>     <r>echać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czyta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adą</l>       <r>echać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edź</l>       <r>echać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytaj"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>echa</l>      <r>echać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytałem"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>echano</l>    <r>echać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>echan</l>     <r>echać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__kochany"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>echa</l>      <r>echać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__zdanie"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adąc</l>      <r>echać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adąc</l>      <r>echać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="BASE__będący"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="poj/echać__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>echać</l>     <r>echać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adę</l>       <r>echać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edzie</l>     <r>echać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czyta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adą</l>       <r>echać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edź</l>       <r>echać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytaj"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>echa</l>      <r>echać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytałem"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>echano</l>    <r>echać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>echan</l>     <r>echać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__kochany"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>echa</l>      <r>echać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__zdanie"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adąc</l>      <r>echać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adąc</l>      <r>echać<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="BASE__będący"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/skląć__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>skląć</l>     <r>skląć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sklnę</l>     <r>skląć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sklnie</l>    <r>skląć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czyta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sklną</l>     <r>skląć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sklnij</l>    <r>skląć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytaj"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zeklnę</l>    <r>skląć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zeklnie</l>   <r>skląć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czyta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zeklną</l>    <r>skląć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>zeklnij</l>   <r>skląć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytaj"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>skl</l>       <r>skląć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__ciąłem"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sklęto</l>    <r>skląć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sklę</l>      <r>skląć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__wzięty"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sklę</l>      <r>skląć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__picie"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>skląwszy</l>  <r>skląć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kraj/ać__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ać</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ę</l>         <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czyta"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ą</l>         <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytaj"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__czytałem"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ano</l>       <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__kochany"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="BASE__zdanie"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ąc</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ąc</l>        <r>ać<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="BASE__będący"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="skląć">           <i></i><par n="/skląć__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dojechać">        <i>doj</i><par n="poj/echać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="jechać">          <i>j</i><par n="j/echać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="krajać">          <i>kraj</i><par n="kraj/ać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="odjechać">        <i>odj</i><par n="poj/echać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="piec">            <i>pie</i><par n="pie/c__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pojechać">        <i>poj</i><par n="poj/echać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="przejechać">      <i>przej</i><par n="poj/echać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="przyjechać">      <i>przyj</i><par n="poj/echać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stłuc">           <i>stłu</i><par n="upie/c__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wjechać">         <i>wj</i><par n="poj/echać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wyjechać">        <i>wyj</i><par n="poj/echać__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="upiec">           <i>upie</i><par n="upie/c__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tłuc">            <i>tłu</i><par n="pie/c__vblex"/></e>
